South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3298.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 9, Chapter 6, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-6-1230. All overtime income of an individual taxpayer is exempt from the tax imposed pursuant to this chapter and may not be included in South Carolina taxable income. The department may require the taxpayer to provide information necessary for proper administration of this section. In implementing this exemption, the department shall ensure that no state taxes are withheld on overtime income. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to income tax years beginning after 2024. ----XX----